District of Columbia statutes.
22-1716

Statement of purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to legalize lotteries, daily numbers games, bingo, raffles, and Monte Carlo night parties, which activities are to be conducted only by the District of Columbia and only those licensed by the District of Columbia and subject to the jurisdiction, authority, and control of the District of Columbia. These activities will provide revenue to the District of Columbia and will provide the citizens of the District of Columbia financial benefits.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 3, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(a)(1), 34 DCR 900

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1516.